Maryland, session 2026, HB0158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0158*

HOUSE BILL 158
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
SUBTITLE 13. MATERNAL HEALTH MONITORING PILOT PROGRAM.
15–1301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ESCALATION PATHWAY” MEANS AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN A
PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION AND A TECHNOLOGY VENDOR ON
THE PROCEDURE TO BE USED WHEN AN ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT’S HEALTH DATA
WARRANTS FURTHER REVIEW AND INVESTIGATION.
(C) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS AN OBSTETRICIAN OR A
MATERNAL–FETAL MEDICINE PHYSICIAN WHO IS:
(1) LICENSED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) CARING FOR A PARTICIPANT.
(D) “MATERNAL DIABETES” MEANS DIABETES THAT:
(1) DEVELOPED PRIOR TO PREGNANCY AND CONTINUES DURING
PREGNANCY; OR
(2) DEVELOPS DURING PREGNANCY.
(E) “MATERNAL HYPERTENSION” MEANS HYPERTENSION THAT:
(1) DEVELOPED PRIOR TO PREGNANCY AND CONTINUES DURING
PREGNANCY; OR
(2) DEVELOPS DURING PREGNANCY.
(F) “PARTICIPANT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 15–1302 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND IS PARTICIPATING IN THE
PILOT PROGRAM.
(G) “PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION” MEANS A MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ADMINISTER THE PILOT
PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 158 3
(H) “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE MATERNAL HEALTH MONITORING
PILOT PROGRAM.
(I) “REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING” MEANS THE USE OF TECHNOLOGY
THAT:
(1) COLLECTS HEALTH DATA FROM AN ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT AND
ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMITS THE DATA SECURELY THROUGH CELLULAR
NETWORKS;
(2) IS AUTHORIZED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION; AND
(3) MONITORS HEALTH DATA, INCLUDING:
(I) BLOOD PRESSURE;
(II) WEIGHT;
(III) BLOOD GLUCOSE LEVELS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER PHYSIOLOGICAL HEALTH DATA DETERMINED
NECESSARY BY THE PARTICIPANT’S HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.
(J) “TECHNOLOGY VENDOR” MEANS THE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY
SELECTED AND CONTRACTED WITH BY A PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION.
15–1302.
(A) THERE IS A MATERNAL HEALTH MONITORING PILOT PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM IS TO SUPPORT PREGNANT AND
POSTPARTUM PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WHO HAVE A HIGHER RISK OF PREGNANCY
COMPLICATIONS BECAUSE OF MATERNAL HYPERTENSION OR MATERNAL DIABETES.
(C) A PROGRAM RECIPIENT IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE PILOT PROGRAM IF THE
PROGRAM RECIPIENT:
(1) IS PREGNANT;

HOUSE BILL 158
(2) IS AN ENROLLEE IN A PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION; AND
(3) HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED WITH MATERNAL HYPERTENSION OR
MATERNAL DIABETES.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) SELECT AT LEAST ONE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO
ADMINISTER THE PILOT PROGRAM IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, PAY A
$2,000 FEE PER PARTICIPANT TO A PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION
TO ADMINISTER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(2) THE TOTAL AMOUNT AWARDED BY THE PROGRAM TO
PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $600,000.
(E) A PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL:
(1) CONTRACT WITH A TECHNOLOGY VENDOR TO OFFER REMOTE
PATIENT MONITORING SERVICES TO PARTICIPANTS;
(2) REIMBURSE THE TECHNOLOGY VENDOR FOR THE COST OF
PROVIDING REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING SERVICES AND DEVICES; AND
(3) ENSURE PARTICIPANTS HAVE ACCESS TO REMOTE MONITORING
SERVICES UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(F) THE TECHNOLOGY VENDOR SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE PREPROGRAMMED TECHNOLOGY SPECIFIC TO EACH
PARTICIPANT; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT:
(I) REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING OCCURS DURING THE
PARTICIPANT’S SECOND AND THIRD TRIMESTERS AND FOR UP TO 3 MONTHS
POSTPARTUM;

HOUSE BILL 158 5
(II) REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING DEVICES ARE DELIVERED
TO EACH PARTICIPANT; AND
(III) EACH PARTICIPANT IS TRAINED ON HOW TO USE THE
REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING DEVICE.
(G) (1) THE TECHNOLOGY VENDOR SHALL EMPLOY A CLINICAL TEAM
THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A NURSE LICENSED IN THE STATE;
(II) A DIETITIAN–NUTRITIONIST LICENSED IN THE STATE; AND
(III) A CERTIFIED DIABETES CARE AND EDUCATION SPECIALIST.
(2) THE CLINICAL TEAM EMPLOYED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL SUPPORT EACH PARTICIPANT BY:
(I) MONITORING AND REVIEWING THE PARTICIPANT’S HEALTH
DATA;
(II) ESTABLISHING, IN COLLABORATION WITH A
PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION, AN ESCALATION PATHWAY TO BE
COMPLIED WITH IF THE PARTICIPANT’S REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING READINGS
AND SYMPTOMS REQUIRE IMMEDIATE ATTENTION FROM THE PARTICIPANT’S
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; AND
(III) PROVIDING HEALTH COACHING TO EACH PARTICIPANT
REGARDING:
1. CONDITION MANAGEMENT;
2. HEALTH BEHAVIOR MODIFICATION; AND
3. NUTRITION.
(H) THE TECHNOLOGY VENDOR SHALL ASSIGN A PROGRAM MANAGER TO:
(1) SUPPORT IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PILOT PROGRAM; AND
(2) COORDINATE EFFORTS BETWEEN THE DEPARTMENT AND THE
PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.

HOUSE BILL 158
(I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT PARTICIPATION IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM REPRESENTS THE GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF THE STATE AND INCLUDES
A STATISTICALLY RELEVANT NUMBER OF PARTICIPANTS.
(J) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $600,000 TO THE PROGRAM.
(K) THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL OPERATE DURING FISCAL YEARS 2027
AND 2028.
(L) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONJUNCTION WITH THE PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS AND THE
TECHNOLOGY VENDORS, SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO
THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PROVIDE
INFORMATION ON THE IMPACT OF THE PILOT PROGRAM ON:
(I) MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM COSTS;
(II) MATERNAL OUTCOMES, INCLUDING:
1. THE RATE OF:
A. MATERNAL MORTALITY;
B. SEVERE MATERNAL MORBIDITY;
C. CAESAREAN SECTIONS;
D. INTENSIVE CARE UNIT (ICU) ADMISSIONS; AND
E. POSTPARTUM HOSPITAL READMISSIONS;
2. THE MEAN LENGTH OF HOSPITAL STAY; AND
3. PREECLAMPSIA; AND
(III) FETAL AND NEONATAL OUTCOMES, INCLUDING:
1. THE RATE OF:

HOUSE BILL 158 7
A. FETAL MORTALITY;
B. FETAL GROWTH RESTRICTION;
C. NEONATAL MORTALITY; AND
D. NEONATAL INTENSIVE CARE UNIT (NICU)
ADMISSIONS;
2. THE MEAN LENGTH OF STAY IN THE NICU;
3. NEONATAL HYPOGLYCEMIA;
4. PRETERM BIRTHS;
5. GESTATIONAL AGE AT DELIVERY; AND
6. BIRTHWEIGHT.
(3) IN DETERMINING THE PILOT PROGRAM’S IMPACT ON THE ITEMS
LISTED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
EXAMINE AVAILABLE PARTICIPANT DATA, INCLUDING:
(I) CLAIMS DATA;
(II) VITAL STATISTICS DATA;
(III) ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS; AND
(IV) ELECTRONIC MEDICAL RECORDS.
(4) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING WHETHER THE
PILOT PROGRAM SHOULD BE IMPLEMENTED STATEWIDE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.